Florida, session 2026, SB566.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (3) of 13 section 319.23, Florida Statutes, to read: 14 319.23âApplication for, and issuance of, certificate of 15 title.â 16 (3)âIf a certificate of title has not previously been 17 issued for a motor vehicle or mobile home in this state, the 18 application, unless otherwise provided for in this chapter, 19 shall be accompanied by a proper bill of sale or sworn statement 20 of ownership, or a duly certified copy thereof, or by a 21 certificate of title, bill of sale, or other evidence of 22 ownership required by the law of the state or county from which 23 the motor vehicle or mobile home was brought into this state. 24 The application shall also be accompanied by: 25 (d)1.âThe applicantâs proof of identity satisfactory to the 26 department. Such proof must include one of the following 27 documents issued to the applicant: 28 a.âA driver license record or identification card record 29 from another jurisdiction that required the applicant to submit 30 a document for identification which is substantially similar to 31 a document required under sub-subparagraph b., sub-subparagraph 32 c., sub-subparagraph d., sub-subparagraph e., sub-subparagraph 33 f., sub-subparagraph g., or sub-subparagraph h.; 34 b.âA certified copy of a United States birth certificate; 35 c.âA valid, unexpired United States passport; 36 d.âA naturalization certificate issued by the United States 37 Department of Homeland Security; 38 e.âA valid, unexpired alien registration receipt card 39 (green card); 40 f.âA Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the United 41 States Department of State; 42 g.âAn unexpired employment authorization card issued by the 43 United States Department of Homeland Security; or 44 h.âProof of nonimmigrant classification provided by the 45 United States Department of Homeland Security. In order to prove 46 nonimmigrant classification, an applicant must provide at least 47 one of the following documents. In addition, the department may 48 require applicants to produce United States Department of 49 Homeland Security documents for the sole purpose of establishing 50 the maintenance of, or efforts to maintain, continuous lawful 51 presence: 52 (I)âA notice of hearing from an immigration court 53 scheduling a hearing on any proceeding. 54 (II)âA notice from the Board of Immigration Appeals 55 acknowledging pendency of an appeal. 56 (III)âA notice of the approval of an application for 57 adjustment of status issued by the United States Citizenship and 58 Immigration Services. 59 (IV)âOfficial documentation confirming the filing of a 60 petition for asylum or refugee status or any other relief issued 61 by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. 62 (V)âA notice of action transferring any pending matter from 63 another jurisdiction to this state issued by the United States 64 Citizenship and Immigration Services. 65 (VI)âAn order of an immigration judge or immigration 66 officer granting relief that authorizes the alien to live and 67 work in the United States, including, but not limited to, 68 asylum. 69 (VII)âEvidence that an application is pending for 70 adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for 71 permanent residence in the United States or conditional 72 permanent resident status in the United States, if a visa number 73 is available having a current priority date for processing by 74 the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. 75 (VIII)âAn unexpired foreign passport with an unexpired 76 United States Visa affixed, accompanied by an approved Form I 77 94, documenting the most recent admittance into the United 78 States. 79 80 A driver license or temporary permit issued based on documents 81 required in sub-subparagraph g. or sub-subparagraph h. is valid 82 for a period not to exceed the expiration date of the document 83 presented or 1 year. 84 2.âDocuments submitted with an application pursuant to 85 subparagraph 1. may include fingerprints and other unique 86 biometric means of identity. 87 88 Verification of the vehicle identification number is not 89 required for any new motor vehicle; any mobile home; any trailer 90 or semitrailer with a net weight of less than 2,000 pounds; or 91 any travel trailer, camping trailer, truck camper, or fifth 92 wheel recreation trailer. 93 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.